Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4137.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-534, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-534. African-American legislative day A. The Arizona office of African-American affairs, in cooperation with state legislators of African descent, shall annually facilitate an African-American legislative day on the second Thursday and Friday of February.  The office shall invite the legislature, the governor and other elected officials to pay tribute to the history and culture of African-Americans and their contributions to the prosperity and cultural diversity of the United States. The office shall schedule activities and discussions between state and community leaders on issues affecting African-American communities. B. African-American legislative day is not a legal holiday. END_STATUTE